South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3014.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-17-20(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) Unless the court orders otherwise, the custody of an illegitimate child is solely in the natural mother unless the mother has relinquished her rights to the child. If paternity has been acknowledged or adjudicated, the father may petition the court for rights of visitation or custody in a proceeding before the court apart from an action to establish paternity the court must award visitation to the father. The frequency, duration, and any other conditions or stipulations regarding the terms of visitation must be set forth in a court order. Within ten days of the order awarding visitation to the father, the mother may file a motion to reconsider along with an affidavit objecting to the award of visitation on the basis that the parent is unfit and poses a risk to the health, safety, and well-being of the child. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----